District of Columbia statutes.
2-1211.01

Statement of purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to create a commission to examine and evaluate proposals, recommendations, and studies in order to establish an enterprise zone or zones in blighted and underdeveloped areas of the District of Columbia (“District”). The commission shall submit a comprehensive plan to the Council of the District of Columbia (“Council”), consistent with historic and residential concerns, to provide for the establishment of an enterprise zone or zones in the District, which will encourage the elimination of economic problems in blighted and underdeveloped areas, foster the growth of small business, and lead to higher employment and economic development.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-171, § 2, 33 DCR 7205

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2251.

Prior Codifications